Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201466-1405
Tax rate; how determined; setoff
authorized.

The amount of the tax imposed and collected on
behalf of this state under an agreement shall be determined as provided in the Compressed Fuel Tax Act and sections
66-482 to 66-4,149. The Department of Revenue in administering the Compressed Fuel Tax Act and sections 66-482 to 66-4,149 shall
provide information and assistance to the director regarding the amount of
tax imposed and collected from time to time as may be necessary. The amount
of tax due under an agreement may be collected by setoff against any state
income tax refund due to the taxpayer pursuant to sections 77-27,210 to 77-27,221.

Laws 1988, LB 836, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 26;

Laws 1997, LB 720, § 20;

Laws 2011, LB289, § 37.

Compressed Fuel Tax Act, see section 66-697.